District of Columbia statutes.
15-704

Advance payment of costs and fees.

Costs and fees for services rendered by the Register of Wills and chargeable to others than the United States or the District of Columbia are payable in advance and shall be collected pursuant to such rules and regulations, not incompatible with law, as are prescribed by the court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 532, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
June 19, 1986, 100 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 99-336, § 4(b)(4)

History

Costs in suits against Board of Education, see §§ 1-204.95, 38-101.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 15-704.
1973 Ed., § 15-704.

Prior Codifications